src/fst/morphology/lexicon.lexc
LEXICON Cases
 +N+Sg+Nom:0   #     ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:i   #     ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:at  #     ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:iat #     ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:as  #     ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:ias #     ;
  #:0   Nouns ; ! Normally going via a R lexicon adding compound tags.


LEXICON N_with-PL_RED1_qelb
!: DIM_CV1toCV2C ; What should this be?
: SG-SUF ;
: PL_RED1_qelb ;



LEXICON N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-SL
+Dial/-SL: N_with_PL_RED2 ;
LEXICON N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL
+Dial/-NL: N_with_PL_RED2 ;
LEXICON N_with_PL_RED2
: DIM_CV1toCV2C ;
: SG-SUF ;
: PL_RED2 ;

LEXICON N_with_PL_RED130
!%^RedPL130130
: SG-SUF ;
@D.PossPx@+Pl:@D.PossPx@%^RedPL130130 PRE-POSS_01 ;
+Pl:%^RedPL130130	PRE-POSS_01 ;


LEXICON N_with_Distr_12323_RED5 !Der/Red5_12323
!%^Red12323
!: DIM_CV1toCV2C ;
: SG-SUF ;
: PL_RED5 ;

LEXICON N-FEM_with-PL_RED2
+Fem: DIM_CV1toCV2C ;
+Fem: SG-SUF ;
+Fem: PL_RED2 ;

LEXICON N-MSC_with-PL_RED2
+Msc: DIM_CV1toCV2C ;
+Msc: SG-SUF ;
+Msc: PL_RED2 ;

! Derivation
LEXICON DIM_CV1toCV2C
@D.PossPx@+Der+Der/Dimin_1i13+N:@D.PossPx@%^Red1i13 SG-SUF ; !+Der/Red1_1i13
@R.PossPx@+Der+Der/Dimin_1i13+N:@R.PossPx@%^Red1i13 SG-SUF ; !+Der/Red1_1i13
@D.PossPx@+Err/Orth+Der+Der/Dimin_1iq13+N:@D.PossPx@%^Red1iq13 SG-SUF ; !+Der/Red1_1iq13
@R.PossPx@+Err/Orth+Der+Der/Dimin_1iq13+N:@R.PossPx@%^Red1iq13 SG-SUF ; !+Der/Red1_1iq13

@D.PossPx@+Err/Orth+Der+Der/Dimin_1iq123+N:@D.PossPx@%^Red1iq123 SG-SUF ; !+Der/Red1_1iq123
@R.PossPx@+Err/Orth+Der+Der/Dimin_1iq123+N:@R.PossPx@%^Red1iq123 SG-SUF ; !+Der/Red1_1iq123

@D.PossPx@+Err/Orth+Der+Der/Dimin_1i123+N:@D.PossPx@%^Red1i123 SG-SUF ; !+Der/Red1_1i123
@R.PossPx@+Err/Orth+Der+Der/Dimin_1i123+N:@R.PossPx@%^Red1i123 SG-SUF ; !+Der/Red1_1i123
@D.PossPx@+Err/Orth+Der+Der/Dimin_12123+N:@D.PossPx@%^Red12123 SG-SUF ; !+Der/Red1_12123
@R.PossPx@+Err/Orth+Der+Der/Dimin_12123+N:@R.PossPx@%^Red12123 SG-SUF ; !+Der/Red1_12123

@D.PossPx@+Der+Der/Dimin_1i1i13+N+Pl:@D.PossPx@%^RedPL1i1i13 PRE-POSS_01 ;! +Der/Red1_1i13_Distr_1212
@R.PossPx@+Der+Der/Dimin_1i1i13+N+Pl:@R.PossPx@%^RedPL1i1i13 PRE-POSS_01 ;! +Der/Red1_1i13_Distr_1212

LEXICON N_DIM_with_PL_12123 !bibədaʔ, bibibədaʔ
+Dimin: SG-SUF ;
+Dimin+Pl:%^Red12123 PRE-POSS_01 ;

! Declension
LEXICON SG-SUF
!@D.PossPx@+Sg:@D.PossPx@ # ; !CHECKME 2021-07
+Sg: PRE-POSS_01 ;


LEXICON PL_RED1_qelb
@D.PossPx@+Pl:@D.PossPx@%^Red1i123   # ;
+Pl:%^Red2CV2CiCV        PRE-POSS_01 ;
!! qəlb+N+Pl: **rain showers**
!!€ %{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}qəlb%^Red1i123
!!€ 00qi0qəlb0

LEXICON PL_RED2
@D.PossPx@+Pl:@D.PossPx@%^RedPL123123 PRE-POSS_01 ;
!@D.PossPx@+Pl:@D.PossPx@%^RedPL123123 # ;
+Pl:%^RedPL123123	PRE-POSS_01 ;
!! bəlups+N+Pl
!!€ %{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}bəlups%^RedPL123123
!!€ 00bəlbəlups0
!!$ %{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}bəlups%^RedPL123123
!!$ 00000bəlups0
!! k̓ʷəčədiʔ+N+Pl: __rabbit/jänis__
!!€ %{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}k̓ʷəčədiʔ%^RedPL123123
!!€ 00k̓ʷəčk̓ʷəčədiʔ0
!!$ k̓ʷəčədiʔ: k̓ʷəčədiʔ+N+Pl

LEXICON PL_RED5
!ʔaciɬtalbixʷ:ʔacaciɬtalbixʷ
@D.PossPx@+Pl:@D.PossPx@%^Red12323 PRE-POSS_01 ;
@R.PossPx@+Pl:@R.PossPx@%^Red12323	PRE-POSS_01 ;

LEXICON PRE-POSS_01
@R.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@+Mod/Subj:@R.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@ PRE-POSS_02 ;
@D.TAM-SUBJ@ PRE-POSS_02 ;

LEXICON PRE-POSS_02
@R.TAM-HAB.HAB@+Hab:@R.TAM-HAB.HAB@ PRE-POSS_03 ;
@R.TAM-HAB.IRR@+Irr:@R.TAM-HAB.IRR@ PRE-POSS_03 ;
@D.TAM-HAB@ PRE-POSS_03 ;

LEXICON PRE-POSS_03
@R.TAM-RE.RE@+Anew:@R.TAM-RE.RE@ PRE-POSS_04 ;
@D.TAM-RE.RE@ PRE-POSS_04 ;

LEXICON PRE-POSS_04
@R.TAM-T.REM@+RemPst:@R.TAM-T.REM@ PRE-POSS_05 ;
@D.TAM-T@ PRE-POSS_05 ;

LEXICON PRE-POSS_05
@R.TAM-A.STAT@+Asp/Stat:@R.TAM-A.STAT@ PRE-POSS_06 ;
@R.TAM-A.PROG@+Asp/Prog:@R.TAM-A.PROG@ PRE-POSS_06 ;
@R.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@+Asp/ProgStat:@R.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@ PRE-POSS_06 ;
@R.TAM-A.PFV@+Asp/Pfv:@R.TAM-A.PFV@ PRE-POSS_06 ;
@D.TAM-A@ PRE-POSS_06 ;

LEXICON PRE-POSS_06
@R.NMZ.V2N@+Der/s+N+Sg:@R.NMZ.V2N@ POSS ;
@R.NMZ.V2A@+Ptc:@R.NMZ.V2A@ POSS ;
@D.NMZ@ POSS ;

LEXICON POSS
@D.PossPx@:@D.PossPx@ K ;
@R.PossPx.Sg1@ PXSG1 ;
@R.PossPx.Sg2@ PXSG2 ;
@D.PossPx@ PXSP3 ;
@D.PossPx@ PXPL1 ;
@D.PossPx@ PXPL2 ;

LEXICON PXSG1
+PxSg1: K ;

LEXICON PXSG2
+PxSg2: K ;

LEXICON PXSP3
+PxSP3:%>s K ;

LEXICON PXPL1
+PxPl1:%>čəɬ K ;

LEXICON PXPL2
+PxPl2:%>ləp K ;
+PxPl2:%>lap K ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Prefixes
!  --------
!! Prefixes in the Southern Puget Sound Salish language are attached to the beginning of other words.

!! Beck, David 2018: Aspectual Affixation in Lushootseed: A minor reanalysis
!! ordering
!! Tense/mood | Poss.subj | nominalizers | Aspect | Stem | Object/voice | others
!! gʷə%<, ƛ̕u%<, tu%<, ɬu%<, bə%< | d%<, ad%< |s%<, dəxʷ%< | ʔu, ʔəs, lə, ləs, ləcu| X |%>s/%>bš, %>sut/%>ut, %>agʷəl, %>b |%>ləp, %>s, %>əxʷ

!! -1/-4?(lə=bə=ʔas-q̓ʷəl-il) proclitic Asp/Prog+:lə%<
!!-4  @U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@:@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@gʷə%< (+Sbj)
!!    @U.TAM-HAB.HAB@:@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@ƛ̕u%<  (+Hab)
!!    @U.TAM-T.REM@:@U.TAM-T.REM@tu%<   (TM/Past+)
!!    @U.TAM-HAB.IRR@:@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@ɬu%<  (+Fut)
!!    @U.TAM-RE.RE@:@U.TAM-RE.RE@bə%<  (+Add)
!!-3  d%<, PxSg2+:ad%< ?| Add+:bə%< 
!!-2  NM+:s%<, dəxʷ%<
!! -1 aspect
!!   @U.TAM-A.PROG@:@U.TAM-A.PROG@lə%<  (non-circumscribed, progressive)
!! @U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-A.STAT@ʔəs%<  (ongoing state: Asp/Stat)
!! @U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-A.STAT@ʔas%<  (ongoing state: Asp/Stat)variant
!!   @U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@:@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@ləs%< (Asp/ProgStat)
!! @U.TAM-A.PFV@:@U.TAM-A.PFV@ʔu%<  (Asp/Pfv)
!! -1 Asp/Cont+:ləcu%< (?Asp/Prog+:lə%< + Asp/Pfv+:ʔu%<) Skagit
!! -1 Asp/Stat:ʔə{sØ}{dØ}xʷ%< (Asp/Stat+:ʔəs%< + dxʷ%<)
!! 
!! X
!! 1 %>s/%>bš, %>sut/%>ut, %>agʷəl, %>b, +Inch:%>il
!! 2 %>ləp, +Px3:%>s, %>əxʷ
!! lə<bə<ləcu<gʷaadgʷad

LEXICON Nouns
noun+N:noun    Cases   ;
bayac+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}bayac N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "" ;
bibədaʔ+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}bibədaʔ N_DIM_with_PL_12123 "" ;
bubx̌əd+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}bubx̌əd N-MSC_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
buusi+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}buusi N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "" ;
bədəʔ+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}bə́dəʔ N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "" ;
bəshikʷigʷilc+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}bəshikʷigʷilc SG-SUF "" ;
bəsq̓ayxʷayxʷ+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}bəsq̓ayxʷayxʷ SG-SUF "" ;
bəsq̓ixʷixʷ+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}bəsq̓ixʷixʷ SG-SUF "" ;
bətə+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}bətə N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
cəlaci+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}cəlaci N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "" ;
c̓awqʷ+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}c̓awqʷ SG-SUF "" ;
c̓ix̌+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}c̓ix̌ N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
dayəsqidəb+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}dayəsqidəb SG-SUF "" ;
duqʷəčabš+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}duqʷəčabš SG-SUF "" ;
dxʷduʔabš+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}dxʷduʔabš SG-SUF "" ;
dxʷləbiʔ+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}dxʷləbiʔ SG-SUF "" ;
dxʷləšucid+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}dxʷləšucid SG-SUF "" ;
dxʷskʷaxʷad+N:dxʷs%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}kʷaxʷad N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
dxʷsx̌əƛ̕alap+N:dxʷs%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}x̌əƛ̕alap N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
dxʷsƛ̕alb+N:dxʷs%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}ƛ̕alb SG-SUF "" ;
dxʷʔaha+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}dxʷʔaha SG-SUF "" ;
dəxʷtulalikʷ+N:dəxʷ%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}tulalikʷ N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
dᶻəɬigʷəd+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}dᶻəɬigʷəd SG-SUF "" ;
gʷədᶻalʔtxʷ+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}gʷədᶻalʔtxʷ N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
huygʷas+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}huygʷas N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
kayə+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}kayə N-FEM_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
kikiyalus+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}kikiyalus SG-SUF "" ;
kəlapx̌ʷəlč+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}kəlapx̌ʷəlč N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
labatu+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}labatú N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
pus+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}pus N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "" ;
puʔtəd+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}puʔtəd N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
pədx̌ax̌aʔ+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}pədx̌ax̌aʔ N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "" ;
p̓uwəyʔ+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}p̓úwəyʔ N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "" ;
p̓əɬq̓ʷačiʔ+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}p̓əɬq̓ʷačiʔ N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
qayuqʷatx̌+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}qayuqʷatx̌ SG-SUF "" ;
qəlb+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}qəlb N_with-PL_RED1_qelb "" ;
q̓il̕bid+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}q̓il̕bid N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
q̓ʷuʔəlƛ̕əl+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}q̓ʷuʔəlƛ̕əl SG-SUF "" ;
sac̓əb+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}sác̓əb N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "" ;
saʔkʷbixʷ+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}saʔkʷbixʷ SG-SUF "" ;
sbalqʷuʔabš+N:s%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}balqʷuʔabš SG-SUF "" ;
scacəlqid+N:s%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}cacəlqid SG-SUF "" ;
scapaʔ+N:s%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}capaʔ N-MSC_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
scəbdati+N:s%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}cəbdati N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "" ;
sduukʷ+N:s%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}duukʷ N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
shiʔwəbš+N:s%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}hiʔwəbš SG-SUF "" ;
skaykay+N:s%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}kaykay N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "" ;
sk̓ayiɬus+N:s%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}k̓ayiɬus N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
sk̓ʷat̕ad+N:s%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}k̓ʷat̕ad N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "" ;
sqaǰət+N:s%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}qaǰət SG-SUF "" ;
sqibk̓ʷ+N:s%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}qibk̓ʷ N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
sqʷubayʔ+N:s%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}qʷubáyʔ N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "" ;
sqʷədabš+N:s%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}qʷədabš SG-SUF "" ;
sq̓əbiyəʔ+N:s%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}q̓əbiyəʔ N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "" ;
ssqʷaliqabš+N:s%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}sqʷaliqabš SG-SUF "" ;
stiqiw+N:s%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}tiqíw N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
swatixʷtəd+N:s%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}watixʷtəd N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
sxʷiuk̓ʷ+N:s%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}xʷiuk̓ʷ N_DIM_with_PL_12123 "" ;
sxʷq̓ʷupabš+N:s%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}xʷq̓ʷupabš SG-SUF "" ;
syayaʔ+N:s%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}yáyaʔ N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "" ;
syaʔ+N:s%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}yaʔ N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
sčatqɬəb+N:s%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}čatqɬəb N-MSC_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
sčətxʷəd+N:s%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}čətxʷəd N-MSC_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
səxʷc̓aʔkʷ+N:səxʷ%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}c̓aʔkʷ N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
səxʷgʷigʷədil+N:səxʷ%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}gʷigʷədil N_DIM_with_PL_12123 "" ;
səxʷpupuhigʷəd+N:səxʷ%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}pupuhigʷəd N_DIM_with_PL_12123 "" ;
səxʷyayus+N:səxʷ%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}yayus N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
sɬax̌i+N:s%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}ɬax̌i N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "" ;
sɬixʷəɬdati+N:s%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}ɬixʷəɬdati N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "" ;
sɬič̓aʔkʷčup+N:s%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}ɬič̓aʔkʷčup N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
taw̓d+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}taw̓d N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
tubšədad+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}túbšədàd SG-SUF "" ;
t̕ukʷtəd+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}t̕ukʷtəd N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
wiw̓su+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}wiw̓su SG-SUF "" ;
x̌aʔx̌aʔəɬdat+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}x̌aʔx̌aʔəɬdat N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
x̌payʔac+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}x̌payʔac N-MSC_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
yiyəq̓ʷ+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}yiyəq̓ʷ N_DIM_with_PL_12123 "" ;
yəw̓yəɬdaʔ+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}yəw̓yəɬdaʔ N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
čubəabš+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}čubəabš SG-SUF "" ;
čəgʷəs+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}čəgʷəš N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "" ;
č̓ač̓aš+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}č̓ač̓aš N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "" ;
č̓t̕ilqʷəbš+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}č̓t̕ilqʷəbš SG-SUF "" ;
šəgʷaq+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}šəgʷaq N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
šəgʷaʔac+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}šəgʷaʔac N-MSC_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
ƛ̕xʷayʔ+v1+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}%{pØ%}ƛ̕xʷáyʔ N_with_PL_RED130 "" ;
ǰəšəd+N:ǰə%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}šəd N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "" ;
ʔaciɬtalbixʷ+v1+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}ʔaciɬtalbixʷ N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-SL "" ;
ʔaciɬtalbixʷ+v1+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}ʔaciɬtalbixʷ N_with_Distr_12323_RED5 "" ;
ʔapəl+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}ʔapəl N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
